Hawaii statutes.
[§142-102] Pigeon permits. The
department shall issue a pigeon ownership permit to any person who raises
pigeons and shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate this part.
[L 1989, c 9, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next